Washington statutes.
RCW 19.230.090

Application for a currency exchange license.

(1) A person applying for a currency exchange license under this chapter shall do so in a form and in a medium prescribed in rule by the director. The application must state or contain:

(a) The legal name, business addresses, and residential address, if applicable, of the applicant and any fictitious or trade name used by the applicant in conducting its business, and the legal name, residential and business addresses, date of birth, social security number or tax payer identification number, employment history for the five-year period preceding the submission of the application; and upon request of the director, fingerprints of the applicant's proposed responsible individual. In addition, the proposed responsible individual must reside in the United States;

(b) For the ten-year period preceding the submission of the application, a list of any criminal convictions of the proposed responsible individual of the applicant, any material litigation in which the applicant has been involved, and any litigation involving the proposed responsible individual relating to the provision of money services;

(c) A description of any money services previously provided by the applicant and the money services that the applicant seeks to provide in this state;

(d) A list of the applicant's proposed authorized delegates and the locations in this state where the applicant and its authorized delegates propose to engage in currency exchange;

(e) A list of other states in which the applicant engages in currency exchange or provides other money services and any license revocations, suspensions, restrictions, or other disciplinary action taken against the applicant in another state;

(f) A list of any license revocations, suspensions, restrictions, or other disciplinary action taken against any money services business involving the proposed responsible individual;

(g) Information concerning any bankruptcy or receivership proceedings involving or affecting the applicant or the proposed responsible individual;

(h) A sample form of contract for authorized delegates, if applicable;

(i) A description of the source of money and credit to be used by the applicant to provide currency exchange; and

(j) Any other information regarding the background, experience, character, financial responsibility, and general fitness of the applicant, the applicant's responsible individual, or authorized delegates that the director may require in rule.

(2) If an applicant is a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, or other entity, the applicant shall also provide:

(a) The date of the applicant's incorporation or formation and state or country of incorporation or formation;

(b) If applicable, a certificate of good standing from the state or country in which the applicant is incorporated or formed;

(c) A brief description of the structure or organization of the applicant, including any parent or subsidiary of the applicant, and whether any parent or subsidiary is publicly traded;

(d) The legal name, any fictitious or trade name, all business and residential addresses, date of birth, social security number, and employment history in the ten-year period preceding the submission of the application for each executive officer, board director, or person that has control of the applicant;

(e) If the applicant or its corporate parent is not a publicly traded entity, the director may request the fingerprints for each executive officer, board director, or person that has control of the applicant; and

(f) A list of any criminal convictions, material litigation, and any litigation related to the provision of money services, in which any executive officer, board director, or person in control of the applicant has been involved in the ten-year period preceding the submission of the application.

(3) A nonrefundable application fee and an initial license fee, as determined in rule by the director, must accompany an application for a currency exchange license under this chapter. The license fee must be refunded if the application is denied.

(4) The director may waive one or more requirements of subsection (1) or (2) of this section or permit an applicant to submit other information in lieu of the required information.

[ 2024 c 50 s 9; 2003 c 287 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 50: See note following RCW 18.415.010.